Delaware, session 153, HB43.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 147, Title 10 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 147. Time for appeal from Superior Court in criminal actions. No (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this section, no appeal from the Superior Court in a criminal action shall be received or entertained in the Supreme Court unless the praecipe or notice of appeal is duly filed in the office of the Clerk thereof within 30 days after the date of the judgment or decree. (b) When an appeal is filed by a pro se inmate confined in an institution: (1) The appeal is timely filed if: a. The inmateâs praecipe or notice of appeal is placed in the institutionâs internal mail system on or before the last day for filing. b. The first-class postage is prepaid. c. The praecipe or notice of appeal is accompanied by a receipt from the institutionâs staff verifying the date and time the praecipe or notice of appeal was placed in the institutionâs internal mail system. (2) The institutionâs staff must give the inmate a copy of a receipt containing the following: a. The name of the staff member who received the inmateâs praecipe or notice of appeal. b. The date and time the praecipe or notice of appeal was placed in the institutionâs internal mail system. c. The case number.